Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB490.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 91A.390 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The commission shall annually submit to the local governing body or bodies
which established it a request for funds for the operation of the commission.
(b) The local governing body or bodies shall include the commission in the
annual budget and shall provide funds for the operation of the commission by
imposing a transient room tax on the rent for every occupancy of a suite,
room, rooms, cabins, lodgings, campsites, or other accommodations charged
by any hotel, motel, inn, tourist camp, tourist cabin, campgrounds,
recreational vehicle parks, or any other place in which accommodations are
regularly furnished to transients for consideration or by any person that
facilitates the rental of the accommodations by brokering, coordinating, or in
any other way arranging for the rental of the accommodations as follows:
1. For a local governing body or bodies, other than an urban-county
government, the tax rate shall not exceed three percent (3%); and
2. For an urban-county government, the tax rate shall not exceed four
percent (4%).
(c) In addition to the three percent (3%) levy authorized by paragraph (b)1. of this
subsection, the local governing body other than an urban-county government
may impose a special transient room tax not to exceed one percent (1%) for
the purposes of:
1. Meeting the operating expenses of a convention center; and
2. In the case of a consolidated local government, financing the renovation
or expansion of a convention center that is government-owned and
located in the central business district of the consolidated local
government, except that if a consolidated local government imposes the
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
special transient room tax authorized under this paragraph on or after
August 1, 2014, revenue derived from the levy shall not be used to meet
the operating expenses of a convention center until any debt issued for
financing the renovation or expansion of a government-owned
convention center located in the central business district of the
consolidated local government is retired.
(d) Transient room taxes shall not apply to rooms, lodgings, campsites, or
accommodations supplied for a continuous period of thirty (30) days or more
to a person.
(e) 1. The local governing body or bodies that have established a commission
by joint or separate action or enacted a tax measure pursuant to this
section or Section 2, 4, or 5 of this Act shall enact an ordinance for the
enforcement of each[the] tax measure enacted in accordance with:[
pursuant to]
a. This section or Section 2, 4, or 5 of this Act; and
b. Section 3 of this Act.
2. Prior to August 1, 2026, the ordinance shall provide for[and] the
collection of the proceeds of this tax measure on a monthly basis.
3. On and after August 1, 2026, the local ordinance shall provide for the
collection of transient room taxes:
a. On a monthly basis, for a person that provides the
accommodations, except as provided in subdivision b. of this
subparagraph; and
b. On a quarterly basis, based on calendar year quarters, for a
person that facilitates the rental of the accommodations by
brokering, coordinating, or in any other way arranging for the
rental of the accommodations.
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
4. The taxes reported shall be due on or before the twentieth day of the
next succeeding month following the end of the:
a. Month, for filers under subparagraph 3.a. of this paragraph; or
b. Calendar quarter, for filers under subparagraph 3.b. of this
paragraph.
(f) The person that collects the rent for the accommodation shall be the party
solely responsible for collecting, reporting, and remitting a tax authorized
by this section.
(2) All moneys collected pursuant to this section and KRS 91A.400 shall be maintained
in an account separate and unique from all other funds and revenues collected, and
shall be considered tax revenue for the purposes of KRS 68.100 and KRS 92.330.
(3) A portion of the money collected from the imposition of this tax, as determined by
the tax levying body, upon the advice and consent of the tourist and convention
commission, may be used to finance the cost of acquisition, construction, operation,
and maintenance of facilities useful in the attraction and promotion of tourist and
convention business, including projects described in KRS 154.30-050(2)(a). The
balance of the money collected from the imposition of this tax shall be used for the
purposes set forth in KRS 91A.350. Proceeds of the tax shall not be used as a
subsidy in any form to any hotel, motel, inn, motor court, tourist camp, tourist
cabin, campgrounds, recreational vehicle parks, or any other person furnishing
accommodations, or restaurant, except as provided in KRS 154.30-050(2)(a)3.c.
Money not expended by the commission during any fiscal year shall be used to
make up a part of the commission's budget for its next fiscal year.
(4) A county with a city of the first class may impose an additional tax, not to exceed
one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the rent. This additional tax, if approved by the
local governing body, shall be collected and administered in the same manner as the
tax authorized by subsection (1)(b) of this section and shall be used for the purpose
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
of funding additional promotion of tourist and convention business.
(5) An urban-county government may impose an additional tax, not to exceed one
percent (1%) of the rents included in this subsection. This additional tax shall be
collected and administered in the same manner as the tax authorized by subsection
(1)(b) of this section with the exception that this additional tax shall be used for the
purpose of funding the purchase of development rights program provided for under
KRS 67A.845.
(6) Local governing bodies which have formed multicounty tourist and convention
commissions as provided by KRS 91A.350(3) may impose an additional tax, not to
exceed one percent (1%) of the rents. This additional tax, if approved by each
governing body, shall be collected and administered in the same manner as the tax
authorized by subsection (1)(b) of this section, with the exception that this
additional tax shall be used for the purpose of funding regional efforts relating to
the promotion of tourist and convention business and convention centers. In no
event shall any revenues collected as provided for under KRS 91A.350(3) be
utilized for the construction, renovation, maintenance, or additions to any
convention center that is located outside the boundaries of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky.
(7) The commission, with the approval of the tax levying body, may borrow money to
pay its obligations that cannot be paid at maturity out of current revenue from the
transient room tax, but shall not borrow a sum greater than can be repaid out of the
revenue anticipated from the transient room tax during the year the money is
borrowed. The commission may pledge its securities for the repayment of any sum
borrowed.
(8) The fiscal court or legislative body of a consolidated local government or city
establishing a commission pursuant to KRS 91A.350(1) or (2) and, in its own name,
a commission established pursuant to of KRS 91A.350(1) is authorized and
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
empowered to issue revenue bonds pursuant to KRS Chapter 58 for public projects.
Bonds issued for the purposes of KRS 91A.345 to 91A.394, may be used to pay any
cost for the acquisition of real estate, the construction of buildings and
appurtenances, the preparation of plans and specifications, and legal and other
services incidental to the project or to the issuance of the bonds. The payment of the
bonds, with interest, may be secured by a pledge of and a first lien on all of the
receipts and revenue derived, or to be derived, from the rental or operation of the
property involved. Bond and interest obligations issued pursuant to this section
shall not constitute an indebtedness of the county, consolidated local government,
or city. All bonds sold under the authority of this section shall be subject to
competitive bidding as provided by law, and shall bear interest at a rate not to
exceed that established for bonds issued for public projects under KRS Chapter 58.
(9) A commission established pursuant to KRS 91A.350(3) is authorized and
empowered to issue revenue bonds in its own name, payable solely from its income
and revenue, pursuant to KRS Chapter 58 for revenue bonds for public projects.
Bonds issued for the purposes of KRS 91A.345 to 91A.394, may be used to pay any
cost for the acquisition of real estate, the construction of buildings and
appurtenances, the preparation of plans and specifications, and legal and other
services incidental to the project or to the issuance of the bonds. The payment of the
bonds, with interest, may be secured by a pledge of and a first lien on all of the
receipts and revenue derived, or to be derived, from the rental or operation of the
property involved. Bond and interest obligations issued pursuant to this section
shall not constitute an indebtedness of the county. All bonds sold pursuant to this
section shall be subject to competitive bidding as provided by law, and shall not
bear interest at rates exceeding those for bonds issued for public projects under
KRS Chapter 58.
Section 2. KRS 91A.392 is amended to read as follows:
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
(1) (a) In addition to the three percent (3%) transient room tax authorized by KRS
91A.390(1)(b), and the one percent (1%) transient room tax authorized by
KRS 153.440, a consolidated local government, or the fiscal court in a county
containing an authorized city, except those counties that are included in a
multicounty tourist and convention commission under KRS 91A.350, may
levy an additional transient room tax not to exceed two percent (2%) of the
rent for every occupancy of a suite, room, rooms, cabin, lodgings, campsites,
or other accommodations charged by any hotel, motel, inn, tourist camp,
tourist cabin, campgrounds, recreational vehicle parks, or other place in which
accommodations are regularly furnished to transients for a consideration or by
any person that facilitates the rental of the accommodations by brokering,
coordinating, or in any other way arranging for the rental of the
accommodations for consideration.
(b) The person that collects the rent for the accommodation shall be the party
solely responsible for collecting, reporting, and remitting a tax authorized
by this section.
(2) The taxes imposed under this section shall not apply to rooms, lodgings, campsites,
or accommodations supplied for a continuous period of thirty (30) days or more to a
person.
(3) (a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, all money
collected from the tax authorized by this section shall be applied toward the
retirement of bonds issued pursuant to KRS 91A.390(8) to finance in part the
expansion or construction or operation of a governmental or nonprofit
convention center or fine arts center useful to the promotion of tourism
located in the central business district of the consolidated local government or
the authorized city located in the county.
(b) 1. This paragraph shall apply to the tax levied pursuant to this section,
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
prior to July 1, 2015, by a fiscal court of a county having a population
between seventy-five thousand (75,000) and one hundred thousand
(100,000) based on the 2010 federal decennial census.
2. When, in any fiscal year, the money collected from the tax authorized by
this section exceeds the amount required to satisfy the annual debt
service for the bond for that fiscal year, all or a portion of the excess
amount collected for that fiscal year may be used to defray the costs to
operate, renovate, or expand the governmental or nonprofit convention
center or fine arts center described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, if
an amount equal to one (1) year's required debt service is held in reserve
to satisfy any future debt service obligations of the bond.
(4) After the retirement of the bonds provided for in this section, the additional
transient room tax levied pursuant to this section shall be void, and the consolidated
local government or fiscal court shall take action to repeal the ordinance which
levied the tax.
(5) As used in this section, "authorized city" means a city of the first class and a city
included on the registry maintained by the Department for Local Government under
subsection (6) of this section.
(6) [On or before January 1, 2015, ]The Department for Local Government shall create
and maintain a registry of cities that, as of August 1, 2014, were classified as cities
of the second class. The Department for Local Government shall make the
information included on the registry available to the public by publishing it on its
website[Web site].
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 91A.345 to 91A.394 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Before August 1, 2025, each local governing body that imposes a local transient
room tax as provided in Section 1, 2, 4, or 5 of this Act, shall submit to the
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
Secretary of State an electronic or hard copy of its:
(a) Local transient room tax return and the accompanying instructions;
(b) Local transient room tax ordinance; and
(c) The name of the local governing body imposing the tax and its contact
information, including the title of the person who administers the tax, the
physical mailing address, email address, and a working telephone number
for the local governing body.
(2) After August 1, 2025, each local governing body shall submit the following to the
Secretary of State an electronic or hard copy:
(a) The information required in subsection (1) (a), (b), and (c) for a newly
levied local transient room tax, within sixty (60) days of the passage date of
the ordinance;
(b) For a change in rate, the updated local transient room ordinance showing
the new rate within thirty (30) days of the change; and
(c) Notification procedures for a change in the contact information required in
subsection (1)(c) of this section within thirty (30) days of the change.
(3) On or before August 1, 2026, the Secretary of State shall prescribe, through
promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A:
(a) A standard local transient room tax return;
(b) Acceptable methods that may be used for electronically submitting the
standard local transient room tax return to the local governing body; and
(c) Acceptable methods that may be used for electronically submitting the local
transient room tax to the local governing body.
(4) The Secretary of State shall develop and update as necessary a set of instructions
on the completion of the standard return to ensure the proper payment of the tax
to each governing body.
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
(5) (a) On or before September 1, 2026, the Secretary of State shall include the
following information on the one-stop business portal or another public
website maintained by that office:
1. The administrative regulation promulgated in subsection (3) of this
section, in the form of a website link or other reference to the
administrative regulation;
2. The instructions for the return required in subsection (4) of this
section;
3. The names of the local governing bodies imposing a local transient
room tax;
4. For each name listed in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph, the
contact information, including the title of the person who administers
the tax, the physical mailing address, email address, and a working
telephone number;
5. The rate for each of the local transient room taxes imposed by each
specific local governing body;
6. The website link or an upload of the local ordinance authorizing the
levy of the local transient room tax or taxes;
7. Electronic links that may be used to electronically file the local
transient room tax return with each local governing body; and
8. Electronic links that may be used to electronically pay the local
transient room return with each local governing body, if available.
(b) The Secretary of State shall update the one-stop business portal or another
public website maintained by that office in sixty (60) days or less after the
receipt of an updated ordinance, a new or amended transient room tax rate,
or other information as required in this section from a local governing
body.
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
(6) All governing bodies that impose a local transient room tax as provided in Section
1, 2, 4, or 5 of this Act shall, by ordinance:
(a) Accept and adopt the standard local transient room tax return;
(b) Establish the method or methods that may be used for electronically
submitting and filing the standard local transient room tax return; and
(c) Establish the method or methods that may be used for electronically
submitting the local transient room tax to its local governing body.
(7) On or after September 1, 2026, a person that facilitates the rental of the
accommodations by brokering, coordinating, or in any other way arranging for
the rental of the accommodations shall not be required to collect, report, and
remit the tax to the local governing body until the Secretary of State publishes the
information required in this section for at least sixty (60) days.
(8) This section shall not be interpreted to authorize the collection of any local tax
revenues by the state government or any agency of the state.
Section 4. KRS 153.440 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and KRS 153.450:
(a) "Person" has the same meaning as in KRS 91A.345; and
(b) "Rent" has the same meaning as in KRS 91A.345.
(2) (a) In addition to the three percent (3%) transient room tax authorized by KRS
91A.390(1)(b), fiscal courts in counties containing cities of the first class or
consolidated local governments may levy an additional transient room tax not
to exceed one percent (1%) of the rent for every occupancy of a suite, room,
rooms, cabins, lodgings, campsites, or other accommodations charged by any
hotel, motel, inn, tourist camp, tourist cabins, campgrounds, recreational
vehicle parks, or other place in which accommodations are regularly furnished
to transients for a consideration or by any person that facilitates the rental of
the accommodations by brokering, coordinating, or in any other way
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
arranging for the rental of the accommodations for consideration.
(b) The person that collects the rent for the accommodation shall be the party
solely responsible for collecting, reporting, and remitting a tax authorized
by this section.
(3) The tax imposed under this section shall not apply to rooms, lodgings, campsites, or
accommodations supplied for a continuous period of thirty (30) days or more to a
person.
(4) All moneys collected from the tax authorized by this section shall be turned over to
the Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation and shall be used to defray operating
costs of the Kentucky Center for the Arts.
Section 5. KRS 153.450 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In addition to the four percent (4%) transient room tax authorized by KRS
91A.390(1)(b)2., an urban-county government may levy an additional
transient room tax not to exceed two percent (2%) of the rent for every
occupancy of a suite, room, rooms, cabins, lodgings, campsites, or other
accommodations charged by any hotel, motel, inn, tourist camp, tourist cabin,
campgrounds, recreational vehicle parks, or other place in which
accommodations are regularly furnished to transients for a consideration or by
any person that facilitates the rental of the accommodations by brokering,
coordinating, or in any other way arranging for the rental of the
accommodations for consideration.
(b) The person that collects the rent for the accommodation shall be the party
solely responsible for collecting, reporting, and remitting a tax authorized
by this section.
(2) All additional moneys collected from the tax authorized by subsection (1) of this
section shall be applied toward the retirement of bonds used to finance a nonprofit
corporation which is created for the funding, construction, and management of a
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1328
convention center in an urban-county, and to defray the operating costs of the
nonprofit corporation.
(3) (a) As used in this subsection, "project" means the renovation, expansion, or
improvement of a convention center on or after July 15, 2016.
(b) In addition to the levy authorized by subsection (1) of this section, an urban-
county government may levy an additional transient room tax not to exceed
two and one-half percent (2.5%) to provide funding for a project.
(c) Proceeds from the levy shall be used only for the direct expenditure for, or
repayment of debt associated with, the project.
(d) The levy shall sunset upon completion of the project and repayment of all
associated debt.
(4) The taxes imposed under this section shall not apply to rooms, lodgings, campsites,
or accommodations supplied for a continuous period of thirty (30) days or more to a
person.
Section 6. This Act takes effect on July 1, 2025.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:50 AM Jacketed